Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
Article 3 County Road Systems

Cross references.

Application for and issuance of writ of mandamus against county board of commissioners or probate judge to compel building, repair, and maintenance of county roads, §

9-6-21

.

Grants to counties for road construction and maintenance, as such grants relate to relief of ad valorem taxation on tangible property in county, §

36-17-20

et seq.